New York, session 2025-2026, A1144.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 1712 of the education law is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 1. The board of education of each school district [may] shall maintain 4 kindergartens which shall be free to resident children between the ages 5 of four and six years, provided, however, such board may fix a higher 6 minimum age for admission to such kindergartens. In the two thousand 7 twenty-seven--two thousand twenty-eight school year and thereafter, all 8 such kindergartens shall be operated on a full-time basis. 9 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 2514 of the education law, as added by 10 chapter 762 of the laws of 1950, is amended to read as follows: 11 1. The board of education of each city school district [may] shall 12 maintain kindergartens which shall be free to resident children between 13 the ages of four and six years, provided, however, such board may fix a 14 higher minimum age for admission to such kindergartens. In the two 15 thousand twenty-seven--two thousand twenty-eight school year and there- 16 after, all such kindergartens shall be operated on a full-time basis. 17 § 3. Subdivision 1 of section 2555 of the education law, such section 18 as renumbered by chapter 762 of the laws of 1950, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 1. The board of education of each city [may] shall maintain kindergar- 21 tens which shall be free to resident children between the ages of four 22 and six years, provided, however, such board may fix a higher minimum 23 age for admission to such kindergartens. In the two thousand twenty- 24 seven--two thousand twenty-eight school year and thereafter, all such 25 kindergartens shall be operated on a full-time basis. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02307-01-5 A. 1144 2 1 § 4. The opening paragraph of subdivision 9 of section 3602 of the 2 education law, as amended by section 9 of part A of chapter 57 of the 3 laws of 2013, is amended to read as follows: 4 School districts may make available full day kindergarten programs for 5 all children wishing to attend such programs, and, commencing with the 6 two thousand twenty-seven--two thousand twenty-eight school year, shall 7 make full day kindergarten programs available to all children. 8 § 5. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 9 the date on which it shall have become a law.